test/src/morphology/V-nipaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nipâw - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninipân
     nipân+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinipân
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nipâw
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nipânwan
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3iSg: nipânm
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninipânmin
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinipânmin
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinipânm
     nipâw+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nipânwag
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninipânsiin
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinipânsiin
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nipânsiin
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nipânsiiwan
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3iSg: nipânsiim
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninipânsiimin
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinipânsiimin
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinipânsiim
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nipâwsiiwag

     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+1Sg: nipânyaan
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+2Sg: nipânyan
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+3Sg: nipând
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+3oSg: nipâwnid
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+3iSg: nipâwng
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+1Pl: nipânyaang
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+12Pl: nipânyang
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+2Pl: nipânyeg
     nipâw+V+IA+Sbj+3Pl: nipâwwaad
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+1Sg: nipâwsiwaan
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+2Sg: nipâwsiwan
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3Sg: nipâwsig
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3oSg: [nipâwsinid, nipâwsinig]
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3iSg: nipâwsing
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+1Pl: nipâwsiwaang
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+12Pl: nipâwsiwang
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+2Pl: nipâwsiweg
     nipâw+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3Pl: nipâwsiwaa

     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nipâwn
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Imm+1Pl: nipândaa
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: [nipâwk, nipâwg]
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Sg: nipâwken
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Int+1Pl: nipâwsiidaa
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Pl: nipâwkegon
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Sg: nipâwkan
     nipâw+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Pl: nipâwkeg
